Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-507
Private employment agency; register.

It shall be the duty of every private employment agency to keep a register in which shall be entered the name and sex of every person for whom employment is secured and the amount of fee charged. Such private employment agency shall also enter into a register the name and address of every person for whom help or servants are secured. Every private employment agency shall also keep a register or booklet in which shall be entered a copy of all advertisements used by it, with the name of the company to which each advertisement refers. Such registers shall at all reasonable hours be open to the inspection and examination of the Commissioner of Labor or his or her agent.

Laws 1921, c. 189, § 6, p. 703;

C.S.1922, § 7732;

C.S.1929, § 48-506;

R.S.1943, § 48-507;

Laws 1972, LB 1460, § 5;

Laws 1977, LB 162, § 6;

Laws 1995, LB 699, § 1.